nl: Inrijgsysteem: Luchtinrijgsysteem (jet of airflow); Automatische naaldinrijger; Inrijgsysteem met kleurcodering; Begeleid inrijgen; Handmatig inrijgen; Overige
sk-SK: Závitový systém: Vzduchové navliekanie (tryska alebo prúd vzduchu); Automatické navliekanie ihly; Farebne kódované navliekanie; Riadené navliekanie; Manuálne navliekanie; Iné
ja: 糸通しシステム: エア糸通し (ジェットまたはエアフロー); 自動針穴糸通し; 色分けされた糸通し; ガイド付き糸通し; 手動糸通し; その他
sv: Gängningssystem: Luftträdning (luftström); Automatisk nålträdare; Färgkodad trädning; Guidad trädning; Manuell trädning; Annat
es: Sistema de roscar: Enhebrado por aire (chorro o flujo de aire); Enhebrado automático de agujas; Enhebrado codificado por colores; Enhebrado guiado; Enhebrado manual; Otro
de: Einfädelsystem: Luft-Einfädelsystem (Jet oder Airflow); Automatisches Einfädeln der Nadel; Farbcodiertes Einfädeln; Geführtes Einfädeln; Manuelles Einfädeln; Sonstige
da: Trådningssystem: Lufttrådning (jet eller luftstrøm); Automatisk nåletrådning; Farvekodet trådning; Guidet trådning; Manuel trådning; Andet
zh-CN: 穿线系统: 气动穿线（喷气或气流）; 自动穿针; 颜色编码穿线; 引导式穿线; 手动穿线; 其他
th: ระบบเกลียว: ร้อนด้ายด้วยลม (เจ็ต หรือกระแสลม); สนเข็มอัตโนมัติ; ร้อยด้ายตามรหัสสี; ร้อยด้ายแบบมีไกด์; ร้อยด้ายแบบแมนนวล; อื่นๆ
en: Threading system: Air threading (jet or airflow); Automatic needle threading; Color-coded threading; Guided threading; Manual threading; Other
ko: 실 끼우기 체계: 에어 스레딩(제트 또는 기류); 자동 바늘 스레딩; 색상 코드 스레딩; 가이드 스레딩; 수동 스레딩; 기타
bg-BG: Система за вдяване: Въздушно вдяване (струя или въздушен поток); Автоматично вдяване на иглата; Цветово кодирано вдяване; Направлявано вдяване; Ръчно вдяване; Друго
lt-LT: Įvėrimo sistema: Orinis įvėrimas (srovė arba oro srautas); Automatinis adatos įvėrimas; Spalvinis įvėrimas; Įvėrimas su kreiptuvu; Rankinis įvėrimas; Kitas
it: Sistema di infilatura: Infilatura ad aria (getto o flusso d’aria); Infilatura automatica dell’ago; Infilatura codificata a colori; Infilatura guidata; Infilatura manuale; Altro
ru: Система заправки нитей: Пневматическая заправка нитей; Автоматическая заправка иглы; Цветовая маркировка заправки; Направляемая заправка; Ручная заправка; Другое
nb: Gjengesystem: Lufttreding (jet eller luftstrøm); Automatisk treding; Fargekodet treding; Veiledet treding; Manuell treding; Annet
zh-TW: 穿線系統: 氣動穿線 (噴射或氣流); 自動穿線; 顏色編碼穿線; 引導穿線; 手動穿線; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de roscas: Enfiamento de linha a ar (jato ou fluxo de ar); Enfiamento automático de agulha; Enfiamento por código de cores; Enfiamento guiado; Enfiamento manual; Outro
hr-HR: Sustav uvlačenja konca: Zračno uvođenje konca (mlaz ili protok zraka); Automatsko uvođenje konca u iglu; Uvođenje konca označeno bojama; Vođeno uvođenje konca; Ručno uvođenje konca; Ostalo
cs: Systém navlékání nití: Vzduchové navlékání (tryska nebo proud vzduchu); Automatické navlékání jehly; Barevně odlišené navlékání; Navlékání s naváděním; Ruční navlékání; Ostatní
sl-SI: Sistem vdevanja niti: Zračno vdevanje (curek ali zračni tok); Samodejno vdevanje niti; Barvno označeno vdevanje; Vodeno vdevanje; Ročno vdevanje; Drugo
vi: Hệ thống ren: Xỏ chỉ bằng khí (tia hoặc luồng khí); Xỏ kim tự động; Xỏ chỉ theo mã màu; Xỏ chỉ có hướng dẫn; Xỏ chỉ thủ công; Khác
tr: İplik geçirme sistemi: Hava ile iplik takma (jet veya hava akımı); Otomatik iğneye iplik takma; Renk kodlu iplik takma; Kılavuzlu iplik takma; Manuel iplik takma; Diğer
fi: Langoitusjärjestelmä: Ilmapujotus; Automaattinen langoitus; Värikoodattu langoitus; Ohjattu langoitus; Manuaalinen langoitus; Muu
hu: Befűzési rendszer: Levegős befűzés (jet vagy légáram); Automatikus tűbefűzés; Színkódos befűzés; Vezetett befűzés; Kézi befűzés; Egyéb
fr: Système d’enfilage: Enfilage par air (jet ou flux d'air); Enfilage automatique de l'aiguille; Enfilage à code couleur; Enfilage guidé; Enfilage manuel; Autre
pt-BR: Sistema de passagem de linha: Passagem de linha a ar (jato ou fluxo de ar); Passagem de linha automática na agulha; Passagem de linha codificada por cores; Passagem de linha guiada; Passagem de linha manual; Outros
ro-RO: Sistem de înfilare: Sistem de înfilare cu aer (jet sau flux de aer); Înfilare automată a acului; Sistem de înfilare cu coduri de culori; Sistem de înfilare ghidată; Sistem de înfilare manuală; Altele
el: Σύστημα σπειρώματος: Πέρασμα κλωστής με αέρα (jet ή ροή αέρα); Αυτόματο πέρασμα κλωστής σε βελόνα; Πέρασμα κλωστής με χρωματική κωδικοποίηση; Καθοδηγούμενο πέρασμα κλωστής; Χειροκίνητο πέρασμα κλωστής; Άλλο
pl: System nawlekania: Nawlekanie pneumatyczne (strumień powietrza); Automatyczne nawlekanie igły; Nawlekanie z kodowaniem kolorystycznym; Wspomagane nawlekanie; Ręczne nawlekanie; Inne